Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.460

Financial planning for retirement—Department of enterprise services to provide information to retirement system members.

The department of enterprise services, through the combined benefits communication project, shall prepare information encouraging individual financial planning for retirement and describing the potential consequences of early retirement, including members' assumption of health insurance costs, members' receipt of reduced retirement benefits, and the increased period of time before members will become eligible for cost-of-living adjustments. The department of retirement systems shall distribute the information to members who are eligible to retire under the provisions of chapter 234, Laws of 1992. Prior to retiring, such members who elect to retire shall sign a statement acknowledging their receipt and understanding of the information.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 472; 1992 c 234 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.